Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-829
Ticket sales; restrictions.

A lottery game retailer shall sell tickets only on the premises stated in the contract. No ticket shall be sold over a telephone or through the mail. No credit shall be extended by the lottery game retailer for the purchase of a ticket.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 29;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 49;

Laws 2026, LB60, § 1.
July 18, 2026